apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="ilustr/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ismo</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ismos</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>isma</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ismas</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="ilustr/e__adj_adv">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ismo</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ismos</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>isma</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ismas</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>em</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="efica/z__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>z</l>         <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="efica/z__adj_adv">
  <e>       <p><l>z</l>         <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zm</l>        <r>zm</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="andalu/z__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>z</l>         <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>za</l>         <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">    <p><l>zes</l>       <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zas</l>         <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="carnu/z__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>z</l>         <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>za</l>         <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zos</l>       <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zas</l>         <r>z<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

<pardef n="difer/ent__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>én</l>        <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ente</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ents</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ens</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éns</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>entes</l>     <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="difer/ent__adj_adv">
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>én</l>        <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ente</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ents</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ens</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éns</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>entes</l>     <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entm</l>      <r>entm</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>enm</l>       <r>entm</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>entem</l>     <r>entm</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="urch/ent__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>én</l>        <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ente</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ents</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ens</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éns</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>entes</l>     <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entismo</l>   <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entismos</l>  <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>entisma</l>   <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>entismas</l>  <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>    

</pardef>


<pardef n="urch/ent__adj_adv">
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>én</l>        <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ente</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ents</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ens</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éns</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>entes</l>     <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entismo</l>   <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>entismos</l>  <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>entisma</l>   <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>entismas</l>  <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entm</l>      <r>entm</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>enm</l>       <r>entm</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>entem</l>     <r>entm</r></p><par n="malam/ent__adv"/></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="dol/ent__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>én</l>        <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ente</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ent</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>én</l>        <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ente</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enta</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ents</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ens</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éns</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ents</l>      <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>entes</l>     <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ens</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éns</l>       <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entas</l>     <r>ent<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ausent">          <i>aus</i><par n="urch/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="capaz">           <i>capa</i><par n="efica/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="competent">       <i>compet</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="correspondient">  <i>correspondi</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="descendent">      <i>descend</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="dirichent">       <i>dirich</i><par n="dol/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="docent">          <i>doc</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dolent">          <i>dol</i><par n="dol/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="parient">          <i>pari</i><par n="dol/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="evident">         <i>evid</i><par n="urch/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="excelent">        <i>excel</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="excelent">        <i>excel</i><par n="urch/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="freqüent">        <i>freqü</i><par n="urch/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="incapaz">         <i>incapa</i><par n="efica/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="incipient">       <i>incipi</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sefardín"><i>sefardí</i><par n="ilustr/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="permanent">       <i>perman</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="procedent">       <i>proced</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prudent">         <i>prud</i><par n="urch/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="salient">         <i>sali</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="torpe">           <i>torp</i><par n="ilustr/e__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="transparent">     <i>transpar</i><par n="difer/ent__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alegre">          <i>alegr</i><par n="ilustr/e__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="ardient">         <i>ardi</i><par n="urch/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="ascendent">       <i>ascend</i><par n="difer/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="audaz">           <i>auda</i><par n="efica/z__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="coincident">      <i>coincid</i><par n="difer/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="convenient">      <i>conveni</i><par n="difer/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="diferent">        <i>difer</i><par n="difer/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="eficaz">          <i>efica</i><par n="efica/z__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="fefacient">       <i>fefaci</i><par n="difer/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="feliz">           <i>feli</i><par n="efica/z__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="firme">           <i>firm</i><par n="ilustr/e__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="fugaz">           <i>fuga</i><par n="efica/z__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="ilustre">         <i>ilustr</i><par n="ilustr/e__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="incoherent">      <i>incoher</i><par n="difer/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="infeliz">         <i>infeli</i><par n="efica/z__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="inherent">        <i>inher</i><par n="difer/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="nuble">           <i>nubl</i><par n="ilustr/e__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="omnipresent">     <i>omnipres</i><par n="difer/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="pacient">         <i>paci</i><par n="urch/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="pertinaz">        <i>pertina</i><par n="efica/z__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="potent">          <i>pot</i><par n="urch/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="reincident">      <i>reincid</i><par n="difer/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="solemne">         <i>solemn</i><par n="ilustr/e__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="tenaz">           <i>tena</i><par n="efica/z__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="urchent">         <i>urch</i><par n="urch/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="veraz">           <i>vera</i><par n="efica/z__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="vichent">         <i>vich</i><par n="urch/ent__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="voraz">           <i>vora</i><par n="efica/z__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="fongaz"><i>fonga</i><par n="carnu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="saputaz"><i>saputa</i><par n="carnu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="catenaz"><i>catena</i><par n="carnu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grandaz"><i>granda</i><par n="carnu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mondongaz"><i>mondonga</i><par n="carnu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="traidoraz"><i>traidora</i><par n="carnu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="torpaz"><i>torpa</i><par n="carnu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tafalaz"><i>tafala</i><par n="carnu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="porcaz"><i>porca</i><par n="carnu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="percaz"><i>perca</i><par n="carnu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mordaz"><i>mordaz</i><par n="efica/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="feraz"><i>fera</i><par n="efica/z__adj_adv"/></e>
<e lm="andaluz"><i>andaluz</i><par n="andalu/z__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tión"><i>tió</i><par n="ilustr/e__adj"/></e>
